apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
<pardef n="ainia/n__n">
  <e><p><l>in</l>        <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>in</l>        <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n-s</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n-s</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n-s</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n-s</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>na-s</l>      <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>na</l>        <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nasa</l>      <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nsa</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nsa</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nsa</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nsa</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ainm__n">
  <e><p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>neacha</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>neacha</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>se</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>se</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ainmh/ian__n">
  <e><p><l>ian-s</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ian</l>       <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iansa</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta-s</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta-s</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta-s</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ianta</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iantasa</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iantasa</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iantasa</l>   <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éine-s</l>    <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éine</l>      <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éinese</l>    <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ainria/il__n">
  <e><p><l>il-s</l>      <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>il</l>        <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ilse</l>      <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lach-s</l>    <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lach</l>      <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lacha-s</l>   <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lacha-s</l>   <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lacha-s</l>   <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lacha</l>     <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lacha</l>     <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lacha</l>     <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lachasa</l>   <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lachasa</l>   <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lachasa</l>   <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lachsa</l>    <r>il<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ainr/iocht__n">
  <e><p><l>eachta-s</l>  <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachta</l>    <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachtasa</l>  <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iocht-s</l>   <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iocht</l>     <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iochtaí-s</l> <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iochtaí-s</l> <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iochtaí-s</l> <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iochtaí</l>   <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iochtaí</l>   <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iochtaí</l>   <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iochtaíse</l> <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iochtaíse</l> <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iochtaíse</l> <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iochtsa</l>   <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ainsc/ian__n">
  <e><p><l>ian-s</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ian</l>       <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iansa</l>     <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éine-s</l>    <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éine</l>      <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éinese</l>    <r>ian<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ainian"><i>ainia</i><par n="ainia/n__n"/></e>
<e lm="ainm"><i>ainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
<e lm="ainmhian"><i>ainmh</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="ainriail"><i>ainria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="ainriocht"><i>ainr</i><par n="ainr/iocht__n"/></e>
<e lm="ainscian"><i>ainsc</i><par n="ainsc/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="ardmhian"><i>ardmh</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="baothmhian"><i>baothmh</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="beophian"><i>beoph</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="bian"><i>bia</i><par n="ainia/n__n"/></e>
<e lm="briocht"><i>br</i><par n="ainr/iocht__n"/></e>
<e lm="bréagriocht"><i>bréagr</i><par n="ainr/iocht__n"/></e>
<e lm="buanriail"><i>buanria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="bunchúil"><i>bunchú</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="bunriail"><i>bunria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="béaltriail"><i>béaltria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="caitian"><i>caitia</i><par n="ainia/n__n"/></e>
<e lm="conaphian"><i>conaph</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="conriocht"><i>conr</i><par n="ainr/iocht__n"/></e>
<e lm="cúil"><i>cú</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="dianriail"><i>dianria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="domhian"><i>domh</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="díriail"><i>díria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="féinriail"><i>féinria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="gail"><i>ga</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="gairdian"><i>gairdia</i><par n="ainia/n__n"/></e>
<e lm="glóirmhian"><i>glóirmh</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="gnáthriail"><i>gnáthria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="grodphian"><i>grodph</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="gárphian"><i>gárph</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="iargúil"><i>iargú</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="marbhphian"><i>marbhph</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="meathphian"><i>meathph</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="mian"><i>m</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="míriail"><i>míria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="obsaidian"><i>obsaidia</i><par n="ainia/n__n"/></e>
<e lm="pian"><i>p</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="raidian"><i>raidia</i><par n="ainia/n__n"/></e>
<e lm="rail"><i>ra</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="riail"><i>ria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="riocht"><i>r</i><par n="ainr/iocht__n"/></e>
<e lm="ráil"><i>rá</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="samhailghrian"><i>samhailghr</i><par n="ainsc/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="sian"><i>s</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="stearaidian"><i>stearaidia</i><par n="ainia/n__n"/></e>
<e lm="sár-riail"><i>sár-ria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="teasmhian"><i>teasmh</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="triail"><i>tria</i><par n="ainria/il__n"/></e>
<e lm="táirmhian"><i>táirmh</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
<e lm="uaillmhian"><i>uaillmh</i><par n="ainmh/ian__n"/></e>
